Montana, session 2025, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 5 6] may be cited as the "Private
Property Protection Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Findings and intent. (1) The legislature has the highest interest in
vindicating and protecting private property rights.
(2) The legislature finds that the constitutional right to acquire, possess, and protect property under
Article II, section 3, of the Montana constitution also embodies the notion of the fundamental right to use
property, including the use of property for financial gain or benefit.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 146

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0146.2
(3) The legislature's intent is to ensure that property use restrictions are limited to those
demonstrably necessary and narrowly tailored to fulfill a compelling governmental interest in public health or
safety.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 5 6], unless the context or
subject matter clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Compelling governmental interest in public health or safety" means a governmental interest of
the highest order in protecting the health and safety of the publicthat cannot be achieved through less restrictive
means.
(2) "Governmental entity" means any unit of state or local government, including but not limited to
a state agency, county, city, town, consolidated city-county, or political subdivision of the state.
(3) "Private property" has the same meaning as "real property" as defined in 70-1-106 THAT IS
OWNED BY A PRIVATE PERSON OR PRIVATE ENTITY.
(4) "Property use restriction" means any law, ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, policy, fee,
condition, test, permit, or other administrative action that restricts the use and enjoyment of private property by
the property owner OR OTHERS IN LAWFUL POSSESSION.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Limitations on property use restrictions -- exceptions. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (2), any property use restriction enacted by a governmental entity pursuant to Title 76,
chapters 1, 2, 3, or 25, must be limited to those demonstrably necessary and narrowly tailored to fulfill a
compelling governmental interest in public health or safety.
(2) [Sections 1 through 5 6] do not apply to:
(a) actions that prevent or abate nuisances as defined in 27-30-101;
(b) the enforcement of the terms of a license, permit, or authorization, including requirements
imposed by federal law; or
(c) a government enforcement action that is the result of a final, nonappealable judicial
determination;

- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 146

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0146.2
(D) ACTIONS BY A TRIBAL GOVERNMENT AS DEFINED IN 2-15-141; OR
(E) A RESTRICTIVE COVENANT ENTERED INTO BETWEEN PRIVATE PARTIES, UNLESS THE IMPLEMENTATION
OR ADOPTION OF THE RESTRICTIVE COVENANT WAS REQUIRED BY A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Enforcement. (1) An owner of private property that is the subject of a
property use restriction in violation of [section 4] may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to
challenge the property use restriction.
(2) The plaintiff shall prevail in an action filed under this section unless the governmental entity
demonstrates to the court through clear and convincing evidence that:
(a) the property use restriction is demonstrably necessary and narrowly tailored to fulfill a
compelling governmental interest in public health or safety;
(b) the property use restriction is the least restrictive means to achieve the stated purpose of the
restriction; and
(c) alternative mechanisms REASONABLE ALTERNATIVES could not achieve the stated interest of the
governmental entity.
(3) If a plaintiff prevails under subsection (2), the court shall permanently enjoin further
enforcement of the property use restriction and shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs.
(4) Nothing in this section supersedes or preempts any existing cause of action that a person may
have under the Montana or United States constitutions, any statute, or common law.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 6. STATUTE OF LIMITATION. THE PERIOD PRESCRIBED FOR THE COMMENCEMENT
OF AN ACTION ALLOWED UNDER [SECTION 5] IS 5 YEARS FROM THE DATE A PERSON BECOMES AWARE OF, OR
REASONABLY MAY HAVE BECOME AWARE OF, THE CAUSE OF ACTION HAVING ACCRUED.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5 6] are intended to be
codified as a new chapter in Title 76, and the provisions of Title 76 apply to [sections 1 through 5 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 146

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0146.2
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Applicability. [This act] applies to laws, ordinances, resolutions,
regulations, rules, policies,ff, ees,cc, onditions, tests, permits, or other administrative actions PROPERTY USE
RESTRICTIONS enacted or enforced ESTABLISHED on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 146